California, session 20252026, AB2710.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Investor-owned utilities provide essential services to millions of California residents and businesses, making their financial stability a matter of public concern.(b) When an investor-owned utility’s credit rating approaches non-investment-grade status, the probability of financial distress rises substantially, and the risk that the state or ratepayers may be called upon to provide financial assistance increases.(c) Decisions by the Public Utilities Commission setting an investor-owned utility’s authorized cost of capital directly affect the utility’s ability to attract investment, service its debt, and maintain financial stability.(d) The Legislature has an interest in receiving timely and accessible financial information from investor-owned utilities before distress reaches a crisis stage, to evaluate whether state action may be warranted.(e) Investor-owned utilities that are reporting companies under the federal Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. 78a et seq.) already disclose extensive financial information through filings with the United States Securities and Exchange Commission. Requiring that information to be presented in a plain language format for the Legislature imposes minimal additional burden while improving legislative oversight.SEC. 2. Section 720 is added to the Public Utilities Code, to read:720. (a) For purpose of this section, all of the following definitions apply:(1) “Cost-of-capital decision” means a final decision or order issued by the commission in which the commission determines the authorized cost of capital for an electrical corporation or gas corporation, including the authorized return on equity, the cost of long-term debt, and the capital structure, and including any decision that establishes or modifies an automatic adjustment mechanism applicable to a component of the authorized cost of capital.(2) “Credit rating agency” means a nationally recognized statistical rating organization that is a credit agency registered with the United States Securities and Exchange Commission, including, but not limited to, S&P Global Ratings, Moody’s Ratings, and Fitch Ratings, to the extent those entities are registered with the United States Security and Exchange Commission.(3) “Near-distress rating” means a long-term issuer credit rating, assigned by a credit rating agency, of BBB by S&P Global Ratings or Fitch Ratings, or of Baa2 by Moody’s, the rating one notch above the minimum investment-grade threshold, or an equivalent successor designation. A corporation shall also be deemed to have a near-distress rating if a credit rating agency assigns a negative outlook, negative watch, or equivalent designation to the corporation’s long-term issuer credit rating immediately above the near-distress rating level.(b) (1) An electrical corporation or gas corporation shall submit a financial condition report to the Legislature in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code under either of the following circumstances:(A) (i) No later than 30 days after the end of each calendar quarter in which the corporation holds a near-distress rating, as assigned by a credit rating agency.(ii) The corporation’s compliance with clause (i) shall begin in the calendar quarter immediately following the quarter in which the rating first reaches the near-distress rating level and end when all credit rating agencies that have assigned a credit rating for the corporation have upgraded the credit rating to at least two notches above the near-distress rating level and no credit rating agency has assigned a negative outlook or watch.(B) Within 45 days of the commission issuing a cost-of-capital decision affecting the corporation, regardless of the corporation’s credit rating at the time of the decision.(2) Each financial condition report shall be based on the corporation’s most recent annual report on Form 10-K, quarterly report on Form 10-Q, or current report on Form 8-K filed with the United States Securities and Exchange Commission, and shall include all of the following:(A) The current long-term credit rating from each credit rating agency, including any outlook or watch designation, and a description of any rating changes since the prior report.(B) Total compensation paid or accrued during the quarter for each executive officer and director, including all salary, bonuses, equity awards, and severance.(C) Total dividends paid to shareholders during the quarter and the total amount of any share repurchases.(D) The number of directors currently serving on the board and the number of unfilled board vacancies.(E) The corporation’s participation in any state-approved wildfire fund, including contributions made during the quarter, the balance of any internal catastrophic event reserve, and any changes to wildfire or catastrophe insurance coverage since the prior report.(F) Net income or loss for the quarter and year to date compared to the same period in the prior year, cash generated from operations, the corporation’s debt-to-equity and interest-coverage ratios, total long-term debt outstanding, debt due within the next 12 months, and available liquidity, including cash on hand and unused borrowing capacity.(G) The total amount of pending legal claims and liabilities, including those related to wildfires or other catastrophic events, the insurance coverage available to offset those liabilities, and any material gaps in that coverage.(H) Any significant events the corporation was required to disclose to the United States Securities and Exchange Commission during the quarter, including debt defaults, covenant violations, leadership departures, or similar developments.(I) Whether the corporation’s independent auditor or management has raised doubt about the corporation’s ability to continue operating as a going concern.(J) A plain language executive summary, not to exceed two pages, describing the corporation’s current financial condition, and steps management is taking to improve it.(K) Any other information the commission determines is relevant to the Legislature’s understanding of the corporation’s financial condition.(c) This section does not create any entitlement to public financial assistance.SEC. 3. The provisions of this act are severable. If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.SEC. 4. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.SECTION 1.This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the Leading with Love Act.SEC. 2.The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a)Investor-owned utilities provide essential services to millions of California residents and businesses, making their financial stability a matter of public concern.(b)When investor-owned utilities face bankruptcy or severe financial distress, ratepayers may be called upon to provide financial assistance through rates, bonds, or other mechanisms authorized by the state.(c)Previous instances of financial distress have resulted in costs being borne by ratepayers without adequate protection of ratepayer interests or adequate accountability for utility management and shareholders.(d)In the future, public financial assistance to an investor-owned utility should not be used to insulate shareholders from the consequences of mismanagement, imprudence, or excessive risk-taking.(e)Any public assistance provided to prevent or recover from utility bankruptcy must include strong protections for ratepayers and accountability measures for utility management and investors.(f)No public financial assistance should be approved unless the Public Utilities Commission finds that shareholders have borne, and will continue to bear, material financial consequences proportional to the assistance provided.(g)The receipt of public financial assistance should not create any expectation, entitlement, or presumption of future assistance.(h)Conditioning public financial assistance on accountability, governance, and ratepayer protections is a valid exercise of the state’s police power over public utilities.SEC. 3.Section 720 is added to the Public Utilities Code, to read:720.(a)For purpose of this section, all of the following definitions apply:(1)“Financial distress” means either of the following:(A)A utility has filed for bankruptcy under Chapter 11 of the United States Bankruptcy Code (11 U.S.C. Sec. 1101 et seq.).(B)A utility is at imminent risk of bankruptcy as determined by the commission based on one or more of the following indicators:(i)A credit rating below investment grade.(ii)Inability to access private capital markets on reasonable terms.(iii)Projected insolvency within 12 months absent extraordinary relief.(2)“Public assistance” means an action, authorization, or approval by the state or the commission that has the effect of transferring financial risk, costs, or liabilities from a utility or its shareholders to ratepayers or taxpayers, or that provides extraordinary financial support to a utility to avoid, mitigate, or recover from financial distress, including, but not limited to, any of the following:(A)Authorization to recover through rates any costs, losses, liabilities, or expenses arising from bankruptcy proceedings, financial restructuring, catastrophic events, or the conduct that precipitated financial distress.(B)State-backed or ratepayer-backed financing, loans, loan guarantees, credit support, liquidity facilities, or other forms of financial backstop.(C)Issuance of rate reduction bonds, recovery bonds, securitization, or similar financing mechanisms supported directly or indirectly by ratepayers.(D)Creation, expansion, or use of a state-administered or state-approved fund, insurance mechanism, or risk-pooling arrangement that limits or displaces shareholder exposure to losses.(E)A deferral, amortization, refinancing, or restructuring of costs or liabilities that would not be available to the utility on a purely private-market basis absent state action.(F)Other mechanisms, whether denominated as regulatory relief, financial assistance, or cost recovery, that the commission or the state authorizes for the purpose or with the effect of stabilizing a utility’s financial condition by shifting risk away from shareholders. (3)“Utility” means an electrical corporation or gas corporation.(b)(1)Public financial assistance to a utility is an extraordinary remedy and shall be disfavored absent a clear showing of ratepayer benefit and shareholder accountability.(2)Public financial assistance shall not be used to preserve private investment value at public expense.(c)A utility shall not receive public assistance to avoid or recover from financial distress unless the commission, after notice and hearing, makes findings that the utility has agreed to all of the following mandatory terms and conditions:(1)(A)Shareholders shall contribute equity capital equal to not less than 25 percent of the total amount of public assistance provided, through one or more of the following mechanisms:(i)New equity investment.(ii)Conversion of debt to equity.(iii)Subordination of shareholder claims.(iv)Other mechanisms approved by the commission that result in shareholders bearing a proportionate share of financial responsibility.(B)The utility, or its parent, subsidiary, or affiliate acting on behalf of the utility, shall not declare or pay common stock dividends until all ratepayer-funded assistance has been fully repaid, including any associated financing costs.(C)The utility shall not repurchase, redeem, or otherwise acquire its own equity securities, for a period of 20 years.(D)Notwithstanding any other law, the return on equity authorized by the commission for the utility shall not exceed the median authorized return on equity for comparable electrical or gas utilities nationwide for a period of 20 years.(2)(A)Total compensation for executive officers and directors, including, but not limited to, bonuses, stock options, long-term incentive compensation, and severance benefits, shall not exceed the 75th percentile of comparable utility positions nationwide, as determined by an independent compensation consultant approved by the commission, for a period of 20 years.(B)Severance packages for executive officers who are terminated or resign for any reason shall not exceed three months of base salary and shall not include accelerated vesting of equity or incentive compensation, for a period of 20 years.(3)(A)A majority of the utility’s board of directors shall consist of independent directors who have no material financial, employment, or advisory relationship with the utility or its affiliates, as determined pursuant to standards adopted by the commission.(B)The utility shall establish a ratepayer advocate position on its board of directors, nominated by the commission and compensated by the utility, whose duty shall be to represent ratepayer interests in board deliberations and decisionmaking.(C)The utility shall establish a dedicated board-level committee responsible for overseeing compliance with all terms and conditions imposed pursuant to this section.(4)(A)The utility shall be overseen by an independent safety monitor appointed by the commission, with authority to review and report on the utility’s safety culture, operational practices, and compliance with applicable law, for a period of 20 years.(B)The utility shall submit to annual independent audits of its safety programs and financial condition, conducted by firms approved by the commission, and the results of those audits shall be made public, for a period of 20 years.(C)The utility shall make publicly available all nonprivileged internal documents material to risk management, safety governance, and financial planning, subject to reasonable redaction for trade secrets and security-sensitive information, with disputes regarding disclosure resolved by the commission, for a period of 20 years.(5)(A)The utility shall maintain insurance coverage at levels determined by the commission to be adequate to cover reasonably foreseeable liabilities, including catastrophic events.(B)The utility shall participate in any industrywide mutual insurance, wildfire fund, or risk-pooling mechanisms established or approved by the state.(C)The utility shall establish and maintain a catastrophic event reserve fund in an amount determined by the commission to address future extreme risk events without immediate recourse to ratepayer assistance.(6)The utility shall not take an action, directly or indirectly, to evade or circumvent the requirements of this section, including through corporate restructuring, affiliate transactions, or reclassification of expenditures.(d)Public financial assistance approved pursuant to this section shall not result in an increase in rates, charges, or surcharges borne by ratepayers.(e)The utility shall provide quarterly public reports, in a form prescribed by the commission, detailing compliance with each term and condition imposed pursuant to this section, including executive compensation, shareholder contributions, safety performance, and use of public assistance funds.(f)(1)An agreement to the terms and conditions required by this section shall be executed by the utility no later than 30 days after the commission issues a proposed decision approving public financial assistance.(2)Failure to timely execute the agreement shall render the approval void.(3)The agreement, and all terms and conditions contained in the agreement, shall remain in effect indefinitely unless otherwise specified. (g)Before approving public assistance, the commission shall make all of the following findings:(1)The utility has agreed to comply with all mandatory terms and conditions specified in subdivision (c).(2)The proposed public assistance is necessary to maintain safe and reliable utility service to California residents and businesses.(3)The terms and conditions imposed provide adequate protection for ratepayers and appropriate accountability for shareholders and management.(4)Alternatives to public assistance, including private financing and ownership restructuring, have been fully explored and are inadequate to address the financial distress while maintaining service quality and safety.(5)The utility has the operational and managerial capability to comply with all imposed terms and conditions.(h)(1)The commission shall continuously monitor compliance with all terms and conditions imposed under this section.(2)If the commission finds that a utility has violated any material term or condition, the commission may do any of the following:(A)Impose monetary penalties of up to one hundred thousand ($100,000) per day of violation, to be credited to ratepayers.(B)Require additional shareholder contributions.(C)Revoke authorization for any ongoing public assistance.(D)Order structural changes to utility governance or management.(E)Initiate proceedings, consistent with existing law, to modify, transfer, or revoke the utility’s operating authority.(3)Violations of the dividend restriction, share buyback prohibition, or executive compensation limitations shall result in automatic penalties equal to twice the amount of the prohibited payment, with those penalties paid by shareholders and credited to ratepayers.(4)In addition to other remedy, the commission may require individual officers or directors responsible for violations of this section to be barred from serving in a management or governance role at a utility.(i)(1)This section does not limit the commission’s authority to impose additional terms, conditions, or requirements on utilities receiving public assistance.(2)This section does not create an entitlement to public financial assistance.SEC. 4.The provisions of this act are severable. If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.SEC. 5.The Legislature finds and declares that Section 3 of this act, which adds Section 720 to the Public Utilities Code, imposes a limitation on the public’s right of access to the meetings of public bodies or the writings of public officials and agencies within the meaning of Section 3 of Article I of the California Constitution. Pursuant to that constitutional provision, the Legislature makes the following findings to demonstrate the interest protected by this limitation and the need for protecting that interest:To protect the trade secrets and security-sensitive information of an electrical corporation, it is necessary to limit the disclosure of that information to the public.SEC. 6.No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.